West Virginia, session 2026, HB4377.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 4. DISABILITY AND DEATH BENEFITS. §23-4-2b. Administration of blood test after traumatic injury to determine intoxication; disqualification for benefits upon refusal. (a) Notwithstanding any provision of this code to the contrary, a medical provider for a person that has suffered a traumatic personal injury that occurred within 12 hours before presenting for treatment by a medical provider, for which the person asserts, or which reasonably appears to have, occurred in the course of and resulting from the person's employment, shall require the person to undergo a blood test for the purpose of determining the existence or nonexistence of evidence of intoxication, according to the standards and criteria set forth in §23-4-2 of this code. The test must be completed within 12 hours of the occurrence of the injury and prior to the administration of medication or the consumption of other substances after the occurrence of the injury that could alter the test results. (b) Only a doctor of medicine, a doctor of osteopathy, a registered nurse, or a trained medical technician, acting at the request and direction of the medical provider, may withdraw blood to determine the alcohol concentration in the blood, or the concentration in the blood of a controlled substance, drug, or any combination thereof. In withdrawing blood to determine the alcohol concentration in the blood, or the presence in the blood of a controlled substance, drug, or any combination thereof, only a previously unused and sterile needle and sterile vessel may be utilized and the withdrawal shall otherwise be in strict accord with accepted medical practices. A nonalcoholic antiseptic shall be used for cleansing the skin prior to venipuncture. Upon the request of the person who is tested, full information concerning the test taken pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be made available to him or her. (c) In the event the person refuses to consent to submit to a blood test or lacks capacity to consent to the administration of the test, the test shall not be given: Provided, That the provisions of this section shall not prohibit the administering of blood tests medically necessary for the treatment of a person. Upon requesting that a person submit to the test, the person shall be given the written and verbal warnings that refusal to submit to the test will disqualify the person and his or her dependents from entitlement to any benefits under this chapter for the injury. After the person is given the required written and verbal warnings, the person shall have the opportunity to submit to, or refuse to submit to, the test. A refusal to submit to the test is considered final after 15 minutes have passed since the refusal: Provided, however, That during the 15 minutes following the refusal, the person may revoke his or her refusal and shall be provided the opportunity to submit to the test. After the 15 minutes have passed following a refusal to submit to the test, the medical provider has no further duty to provide the person with an opportunity to take the test, and the refusal shall be final. (d) After the person’s refusal to take the test has become final, the right of the person and his or her dependents to any benefits under the provisions of this chapter as compensation for the injury are forfeited and revoked.(e) The person tested may, at his or her own expense, have a doctor of medicine or osteopathy, a registered nurse, or trained medical technician of his or her own choosing, administer a chemical test in addition to the test administered pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.(f) Upon request, the medical provider shall provide the person tested and the employer of the person tested, with the results of the test, or, if the test is refused, an affidavit or other documentation as evidence or proof of the person’s refusal to submit to the test.(g) No person who administers a test pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, or medical provider in or with which such person is employed or is otherwise associated or in which such test is administered, and no other person, firm or corporation by whom or with which such person is employed or is in any way associated, shall be in any way criminally liable for the administration of a test administered pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, or civilly liable in damages to the person tested unless for gross negligence or willful or wanton injury.(h) This section shall become effective on July 1, 2026.